Indiana, session 2026, HB1119.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-38-6-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. (a) As used in this section, "participate in or be
in attendance at an execution" includes:
(1) personally preparing the convicted person;
(2) personally servicing, preparing, or maintaining equipment
used for the execution; or
(3) supervising the activities of other personnel involved in
carrying out an execution.
(b) The commissioner of the department of correction may not
require, as a condition of employment or as a contractual
obligation:
(1) an employee of; or
(2) a person providing contractual services to;
the department of correction to participate in or be in attendance
at an execution if this is contrary to the moral or religious beliefs
of the employee or person providing contractual services.
HB 1119—LS 6521/DI 106


SECTION 2. IC 35-38-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 322, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in
section 1.5 of this chapter, the punishment of death shall be inflicted
carried out by intravenous injection of a lethal substance or substances
into the convicted person:
(1) in a quantity sufficient to cause the death of the convicted
person; and
(2) until the convicted person is dead.
(b) The death penalty shall be inflicted carried out before the hour
of sunrise on a date fixed by the sentencing court. However, the
execution must not occur until at least one hundred (100) days after the
conviction.
(c) The warden of the appropriate state prison, or persons
designated by the warden, shall designate the person who is to serve as
the executioner.
(d) The department of correction may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
necessary to implement subsection (a).
(e) The department of correction may make and enter into a contract
with an outsourcing facility, a wholesale drug distributor (as defined in
IC 25-26-14-12), a pharmacy (as defined in IC 25-26-13-2), or a
pharmacist (as defined in IC 25-26-13-2) for the issuance or
compounding of a lethal substance necessary to carry out an execution
by lethal injection. A lethal substance provided to the department of
correction under this subsection may be used only for the purpose of
carrying out an execution by lethal injection. The issuance or
compounding of a lethal substance under this subsection:
(1) does not constitute the practice of pharmacy (as defined in
IC 25-26-13-2);
(2) is not subject to the jurisdiction of the Indiana board of
pharmacy, the medical licensing board of Indiana, the Indiana
department of health, or the Indiana professional licensing
agency; and
(3) is exempt from the provisions of IC 25.
A pharmacist, a pharmacy, a wholesale drug distributor, or an
outsourcing facility that provides a lethal substance to the department
of correction under this subsection shall label the lethal substance with
the name of the lethal substance, its dosage, a projected expiration date,
and a statement that the lethal substance shall be used only by the
department of correction for the purpose of carrying out an execution
by lethal injection.
(f) The following are confidential, are not subject to discovery, and
HB 1119—LS 6521/DI 106


may not be introduced as evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding:
(1) The identity of a person described in subsection (e) that enters
into a contract with the department of correction under subsection
(e) for the issuance or compounding of lethal substances
necessary to carry out an execution by lethal injection.
(2) The identity of an officer, an employee, or a contractor of a
person described in subdivision (1).
(3) The identity of a person contracted by a person described in
subdivision (1) to obtain equipment or a substance to facilitate the
compounding of a lethal substance described in subsection (e).
(4) Information reasonably calculated to lead to the identity of a
person described in this subsection, including a:
(A) name;
(B) residential or business address;
(C) residential or office telephone number; and
(D) Social Security number or tax identification number.
This subsection applies retroactively to any request for information,
discovery request, or proceeding, no matter when made or initiated.
SECTION 3. IC 35-38-6-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) The department of correction may carry out
an execution by:
(1) lethal injection; or
(2) firing squad;
as determined by the commissioner of the department of
correction.
(b) The department of correction shall establish a facility and a
protocol for carrying out an execution by firing squad.
(c) An execution shall be carried out within the time frame
described in section 1(b) of this chapter.
(d) An execution by firing squad shall be carried out by a firing
squad consisting of three (3) individuals who are selected by the
warden of the prison where the execution will be carried out. Each
individual shall fire a weapon containing live ammunition. No
blanks may be used.
(e) The department of correction may adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 necessary to implement this chapter.
(f) The following are confidential, are not subject to discovery,
and may not be introduced as evidence in any civil or criminal
proceeding:
(1) The identity of any member of an execution team.
(2) The identity of any individual designated as eligible to
HB 1119—LS 6521/DI 106


serve as a member of an execution team.
(3) Information reasonably calculated to lead to the identity
of an individual described in this subsection.
(h) The department of correction shall contract with a:
(1) psychologist licensed under IC 25-33; or
(2) psychiatrist licensed as a physician under IC 25-22.5;
having expertise in treating posttraumatic stress disorder to make
mental health services available to a member of an execution team
for treatment of issues resulting from the member's participation
on the execution team. The expenses of treatment shall be paid
from the funds appropriated to the department for state
correctional facilities operations.
SECTION 4. IC 35-38-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.67-2017,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The court in which a death sentence is ordered
shall issue a warrant to the sheriff within fourteen (14) days of the
sentence:
(1) that is under the seal of the court;
(2) that contains notice of the conviction and the sentence;
(3) that is directed to the warden of the appropriate state prison;
and
(4) that orders the warden to execute the convicted person at a
specified time and date in the appropriate state prison.
SECTION 5. IC 35-38-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.67-2017,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. A sheriff who receives a warrant under section
2 or section 7 of this chapter shall immediately:
(1) transport the person to the appropriate state prison;
(2) deliver the person and the warrant to the warden of the prison;
(3) obtain a receipt for the delivery of the person; and
(4) deliver the receipt to the clerk of the sentencing court.
SECTION 6. IC 35-38-6-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The convicted
person shall be confined in the a state prison until the date of the
convicted person's execution. The convicted person may temporarily
be held in a maximum security facility for security purposes or during
renovation of the state prison. A convicted female shall be confined in
a maximum security women's prison until not more than thirty (30)
days before the date of her execution. A convicted female shall be
segregated from male prisoners after her transfer from the women's
prison.
(b) The convicted person's:
HB 1119—LS 6521/DI 106


(1) attorney;
(2) physician;
(3) relatives;
(4) friends; and
(5) spiritual advisor;
may visit the convicted person while the convicted person is confined.
The department of correction shall adopt rules, under IC 4-22-2,
governing such these visits.
SECTION 7. IC 35-38-6-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The execution must
take place inside the walls of the an Indiana state prison in a room
arranged for that purpose. The department of correction shall provide
the necessary room and appliances equipment to carry out the
execution as provided in this chapter.
SECTION 8. IC 35-38-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.67-2017,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Only the following persons may be present
at the execution:
(1) The warden of the state prison.
(2) The person Persons designated by the warden of the state
prison and any assistants who are necessary to assist in the
execution.
(3) The prison physician.
(4) One (1) other physician.
(5) The spiritual advisor of the convicted person.
(6) The prison chaplain.
(7) Not more than five (5) friends or relatives of the convicted
person who are invited by the convicted person to attend.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (b), not more than eight (8)
of the following members of the victim's immediate family who
are at least eighteen (18) years of age:
(A) The victim's spouse.
(B) One (1) or more of the victim's children.
(C) One (1) or more of the victim's parents.
(D) One (1) or more of the victim's grandparents.
(E) One (1) or more of the victim's siblings.
(9) At least one (1) pooled media witness, selected by the
department from media organizations that primarily cover
the statehouse. A media witness is subject to reasonable
security restrictions established by the department.
(b) If there is more than one (1) victim, not more than eight (8)
persons who are members of the victims' immediate families may be
HB 1119—LS 6521/DI 106


present at the execution. The department shall determine which persons
may be present in accordance with procedures adopted under
subsection (c).
(c) The department shall develop procedures to determine which
family members of a victim may be present at the execution if more
than eight (8) family members of a victim desire to be present or if
there is more than one (1) victim. Upon the request of a family member
of a victim, the department shall establish a support room for the use
of:
(1) an immediate family member of the victim described in
subsection (a)(8) who is not selected to be present at the
execution; and
(2) a person invited by an immediate family member of the victim
described in subsection (a)(8) to offer support to the immediate
family member.
(d) The warden of the state prison may exclude a person from
viewing the execution if the warden determines that the presence of the
person would threaten the safety or security of the state prison and sets
forth this determination in writing.
(e) The department of correction:
(1) shall keep confidential the identities of persons who assist the
warden of the state prison in an execution; and
(2) may:
(A) classify as confidential; and
(B) withhold from the public;
any part of a document relating to an execution that would reveal
the identity of a person who assists the warden in the execution.
SECTION 9. IC 35-38-6-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.67-2017,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) If the convicted person:
(1) escapes from custody before the date set for execution; and
(2) is recaptured before the date set for execution;
the convicted person shall be confined and executed according to the
terms of the warrant.
(b) If the convicted person:
(1) escapes from custody before delivery to the warden of the
appropriate state prison; and
(2) is recaptured after the date set for execution;
any person may arrest and commit the convicted person to the jail of
the county in which the convicted person was sentenced. The sheriff
shall notify the sentencing court of the recapture, and the court shall fix
a new date for the execution. The new execution date must not be less
HB 1119—LS 6521/DI 106


than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) days after the recapture of the
person. The court shall issue a new warrant in the form prescribed by
section 2 of this chapter.
(c) If the convicted person:
(1) escapes from confinement; and
(2) is recaptured after the date set for execution;
any person may arrest and commit the convicted person to the
department of correction. When the convicted person is returned to the
department of correction or a facility or place designated by the
department of correction, the department shall notify the sentencing
court, and the court shall fix a new date for the execution. The new
execution date must not be less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60)
days after the recapture of the person. The court shall issue a warrant
to the department of correction directing the superintendent warden of
the appropriate state prison to execute the convicted person at a
specified time and date in the state prison.
SECTION 10. IC 35-38-6-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.67-2017,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. If the physician of the state prison where a
condemned woman is scheduled to be executed, and one (1) other
physician, certify in writing to the warden of the state prison and the
sentencing court that a the condemned woman is pregnant, the warden
shall suspend the execution of the sentence. When the state prison
physician and one (1) other physician certify in writing to the warden
of the state prison and the sentencing court that the woman is no longer
pregnant, the sentencing court shall immediately fix a new execution
date.
HB 1119—LS 6521/DI 106


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Courts and Criminal Code, to
which was referred House Bill 1119, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 35-38-6-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. (a) As used in this section,
"participate in or be in attendance at an execution" includes:
(1) personally preparing the convicted person;
(2) personally servicing, preparing, or maintaining equipment
used for the execution; or
(3) supervising the activities of other personnel involved in
carrying out an execution.
(b) The commissioner of the department of correction may not
require, as a condition of employment or as a contractual
obligation:
(1) an employee of; or
(2) a person providing contractual services to;
the department of correction to participate in or be in attendance
at an execution if this is contrary to the moral or religious beliefs
of the employee or person providing contractual services.".
Page 3, delete lines 2 through 42, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 2. IC 35-38-6-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) The department of
correction may carry out an execution by:
(1) lethal injection;
(2) firing squad; or
(3) nitrogen hypoxia;
as determined by the commissioner of the department of
correction.
(b) The department of correction shall establish a facility and a
protocol for carrying out an execution by firing squad.
(c) The department of correction shall establish a facility and a
protocol for carrying out an execution by nitrogen hypoxia.
(d) An execution shall be carried out within the time frame
described in section 1(b) of this chapter.
(e) An execution by firing squad shall be carried out by a firing
squad consisting of three (3) individuals who are selected by the
HB 1119—LS 6521/DI 106


warden of the prison where the execution will be carried out. Each
individual shall fire a weapon containing live ammunition. No
blanks may be used.
(f) The department of correction may adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 necessary to implement this chapter.
(g) The following are confidential, are not subject to discovery,
and may not be introduced as evidence in any civil or criminal
proceeding:
(1) The identity of any member of an execution team.
(2) The identity of any individual designated as eligible to
serve as a member of an execution team.
(3) Information reasonably calculated to lead to the identity
of an individual described in this subsection.".
Page 4, delete line 1.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1119 as introduced.)
MCNAMARA
Committee Vote: yeas 8, nays 5.
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1119 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 4, between lines 6 and 7, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(h) The department of correction shall contract with a:
(1) psychologist licensed under IC 25-33; or
(2) psychiatrist licensed as a physician under IC 25-22.5;
having expertise in treating posttraumatic stress disorder to make
mental health services available to a member of an execution team
for treatment of issues resulting from the member's participation
on the execution team. The expenses of treatment shall be paid
from the funds appropriated to the department for state
correctional facilities operations.".
(Reference is to HB 1119 as printed January 22, 2026.)
GARCIA WILBURN
HB 1119—LS 6521/DI 106


HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1119 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 5, between lines 30 and 31, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(9) At least one (1) pooled media witness, selected by the
department from media organizations that primarily cover
the statehouse. A media witness is subject to reasonable
security restrictions established by the department.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to HB 1119 as printed January 22, 2026.)
ZIMMERMAN
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1119 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 3, line 23, after "injection;" insert "or".
Page 3, line 24, delete "or".
Page 3, delete line 25.
Page 3, delete lines 30 through 31.
Page 3, line 32, delete "(d)" and insert "(c)".
Page 3, line 34, delete "(e)" and insert "(d)".
Page 3, line 39, delete "(f)" and insert "(e)".
Page 3, line 41, delete "(g)" and insert "(f)".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to HB 1119 as printed January 22, 2026.)
ZIMMERMAN
HB 1119—LS 6521/DI 106